Arkansas, session 2025, HB1195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-303(a)(1)(C)(i), concerning an
employee of a municipality that covers its employees under the Arkansas
Public Employees' Retirement System and his or her decision to opt into
participation in the local retirement plan instead, is amended to read as
follows:
(C)(i) If the employee elects not to continue
*LJH062*
01/21/2025 4:19:20 PM LJH062

HB1195
participation in the system and opts to participate in the local retirement
plan as provided under § 24-12-121 or § 24-12-123, instead, written notice of
the election shall be presented to the system in a form determined acceptable
by the system not later than ninety (90) calendar days after first assuming
office during his or her first term and any subsequent term.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
(a) An employee under § 24-4-303(a)(1)(C)(i), including without
limitation a mayor or city clerk of a city of the first class, shall have
ninety (90) days from the effective date of this act to elect not to
participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and instead
to participate in the local retirement plan as provided under § 24-12-121 or
§ 24-12-123 by providing written notice of the election to the system in the
same form determined acceptable by the system under § 24-4-303(a)(1)(C)(i).
(b) The additional ninety (90) days provided in subsection (a) of this
section does not make the employee ineligible to exercise his or her right to
elect not to participate in the system and instead to participate in the
local retirement plan as provided under § 24-12-121 or § 24-12-123 during the
first ninety (90) days of his or her subsequent term as provided by this act.

















01/21/2025 4:19:20 PM LJH062